Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.400

Language access program.

RCW 28A.183.040 and 28A.183.050 govern school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and apply to charter schools established under this chapter.

[ 2022 c 107 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 107: See note following RCW 28A.183.010.